New York, session 2025-2026, A8799.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Adjustment to stipends of certain incumbents in the state 2 university of New York. (a) The stipend as of academic year 2023-2024 3 for an incumbent of a position in the state university of New York in 4 the collective negotiating unit designated as the state university grad- 5 uate student negotiating unit in the state university of New York estab- 6 lished pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, on September 30, 7 2023, shall be increased by three percent adjusted to the nearest whole 8 dollar, commencing the beginning of the payroll period the first day of 9 which is nearest to October 1, 2023. "Incumbent," as referenced in this 10 subdivision, shall be defined as members of the state university gradu- 11 ate student negotiating unit established pursuant to article 14 of the 12 civil service law who were employed by the state university of New York 13 on the effective date of the increase and at the time of payment. 14 (b) The stipend as of academic year 2024-2025 for an incumbent of a 15 position in the state university of New York in the collective negotiat- 16 ing unit designated as the state university graduate student negotiating 17 unit in the state university of New York established pursuant to article 18 14 of the civil service law, on September 30, 2024, shall be increased EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12015-02-5 A. 8799 2 1 by three percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar, commencing the 2 beginning of the payroll period the first day of which is nearest to 3 October 1, 2024. "Incumbent," as referenced in this subdivision, shall 4 be defined as members of the state university graduate student negotiat- 5 ing unit established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law who 6 were employed by the state university of New York on the effective date 7 of the increase and at the time of payment. 8 (c) The stipend as of academic year 2025-2026 for an incumbent of a 9 position in the state university of New York in the collective negotiat- 10 ing unit designated as the state university graduate student negotiating 11 unit in the state university of New York established pursuant to article 12 14 of the civil service law, on September 30, 2025, shall be increased 13 by three percent adjusted to the nearest whole dollar, commencing the 14 beginning of the payroll period the first day of which is nearest to 15 October 1, 2025. "Incumbent," as referenced in this subdivision, shall 16 be defined as members of the state university graduate student negotiat- 17 ing unit established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law who 18 were employed by the state university of New York on the effective date 19 of the increase and at the time of payment. 20 (d) (i) This subdivision shall apply to employees in the collective 21 negotiating unit designated as the state university graduate student 22 negotiating unit in the state university of New York established pursu- 23 ant to article 14 of the civil service law. 24 (ii) The minimum stipend for academic year 2023-2024 shall increase by 25 three percent to $11,102 annually for employees on full assistantships 26 at University Centers and Health Science Centers effective concurrent 27 with the effective date of the increase in subdivision (a) of this 28 section commencing the beginning of the payroll period the first day of 29 which is nearest to October 1, 2023. 30 (iii) The minimum stipend for academic year 2024-2025 shall increase 31 by three percent to $11,435 annually for employees on full assistant- 32 ships at University Centers and Health Science Centers effective concur- 33 rent with the effective date of the increase in subdivision (b) of this 34 section commencing the beginning of the payroll period the first day of 35 which is nearest to October 1, 2024. 36 (iv) The minimum stipend for academic year 2025-2026 shall increase by 37 three percent to be $11,778 annually for employees on full assistant- 38 ships at University Centers and Health Science Centers effective concur- 39 rent with the effective date of the increase in subdivision (c) of this 40 section commencing the beginning of the payroll period the first day of 41 which is nearest to October 1, 2025. 42 (v) Effective July 1, 2026, the minimum annual stipend shall be 43 $18,000 for employees on full assistantships at university center 44 campuses and health science centers. Effective July 1, 2026, the mini- 45 mum annual stipend shall be $7,500 for employees on full assistantships 46 at comprehensive college campuses. 47 (vi) Effective October 1, 2025, the state shall pay those with full- 48 time assistantships a total of a lump sum, non-recurring, not on base 49 payment of $1,500. Individuals on less than full-time assistantships 50 shall be paid $750. To be eligible for payment, an individual must be 51 employed as of the effective date of the payment and the date of 52 payment. 53 (vii) Nothing herein shall prevent the state university of New York, 54 in its discretion, from increasing amounts paid to an incumbent of a 55 position of the state university graduate student negotiating unit in 56 the state university of New York established pursuant to article 14 of A. 8799 3 1 the civil service law in addition to the minimum stipend provided, 2 however, that the amounts required for such other increases and the cost 3 of fringe benefits attributable to such other increases, as determined 4 by the comptroller, are made available to the state in accordance with 5 procedures established by the state university of New York. 6 (e) Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, 7 any increase in compensation or lump sum payment may be withheld in 8 whole or in part from any employee to whom the provisions of this 9 section are applicable when, in the opinion of the chancellor of the 10 state university of New York, the director of the budget, and the direc- 11 tor of the office of employee relations, such increase is not warranted 12 or is not appropriate. 13 § 2. Doctoral program recruitment and retention enhancement fund. 14 There is hereby continued, within the state university of New York, a 15 doctoral program recruitment and retention enhancement fund from the 16 amounts appropriated herein. Such fund shall be used to enhance employee 17 compensation for the purpose of recruitment and retention of new and 18 existing doctoral students in selected programs. The specific doctoral 19 programs eligible for enhanced compensation pursuant to this section 20 shall be at the discretion of the state university of New York. Pursuant 21 to the terms of the collective bargaining agreement, funds will be allo- 22 cated for these purposes upon mutual agreement of the parties from 23 available appropriations. To be eligible for such payment, an employee 24 must be employed on or after July 2, 2023 and at the time of payment. 25 This program shall expire July 1, 2026. 26 § 3. Comprehensive college graduate program recruitment and retention 27 fund. There is hereby continued, within the state university of New 28 York, a comprehensive college graduate program recruitment and retention 29 fund from the amounts appropriated herein. Such fund shall be used to 30 enhance employee compensation for the purpose of recruitment and 31 retention of new and existing graduate students in selected degree 32 programs. The specific graduate degree programs eligible for enhanced 33 compensation pursuant to this section shall be at the discretion of the 34 state university of New York. Pursuant to the terms of the collective 35 bargaining agreement, funds will be allocated for these purposes upon 36 mutual agreement of the parties from available appropriations. To be 37 eligible for such payment, an employee must be employed on or after July 38 2, 2023 and at the time of payment. This program shall expire July 1, 39 2026. 40 § 4. Fee mitigation fund. There is hereby continued, within the state 41 university of New York, a fee mitigation fund from the amounts appropri- 42 ated herein. Such fund shall be used for the purpose of funding the cost 43 of various fees, including but not limited to technology fees. Pursuant 44 to the terms of the collective bargaining agreement, funds will be allo- 45 cated for these purposes upon mutual agreement of the parties from 46 available appropriations. To be eligible for such payment, an employee 47 must be employed on or after July 2, 2023 and at the time of payment. 48 This program shall expire July 1, 2026. 49 § 5. Downstate location fund. There is hereby continued, within the 50 state university of New York, a downstate location fund from the amounts 51 appropriated herein. Such fund shall be used for the purpose of funding 52 location adjustments in the downstate area for employees whose work site 53 is New York City, Suffolk, Nassau, Rockland, Westchester, Dutchess, 54 Putnam or Orange counties or as defined by the parties by agreement. The 55 specific location adjustments funded pursuant to this section shall be 56 at the discretion of the state university of New York. Pursuant to the A. 8799 4 1 terms of the collective bargaining agreement, funds will be allocated 2 for these purposes upon mutual agreement of the parties from available 3 appropriations. To be eligible for such payment, an employee must be 4 employed on or after July 2, 2023 and at the time of payment. This 5 program shall expire July 1, 2026. 6 § 6. Joint labor management advisory board. Pursuant to the terms of 7 an agreement negotiated between the state and the employee organization 8 representing employees in the collective negotiating unit designated as 9 the state university graduate student negotiating unit in the state 10 university of New York established pursuant to article 14 of the civil 11 service law, there shall be continued a joint labor management advisory 12 board to study and make recommendations concerning issues of work-life 13 services programs and implement agreements that may be entered into 14 between the state and such employee organization concerning such issues. 15 Pursuant to the terms of the collective bargaining agreement, funds will 16 be allocated for these purposes upon mutual agreement of the parties 17 from available appropriations. 18 § 7. Work-life services and pre-tax programs. Pursuant to the terms of 19 an agreement negotiated between the state and the employee organization 20 representing the collective negotiating unit designated as the state 21 university graduate student negotiating unit in the state university of 22 New York established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, 23 there shall be continued work-life services and pre-tax programs to be 24 administered in accordance with such agreement within the appropriations 25 made available therefor. Pursuant to the terms of the collective 26 bargaining agreement, funds will be allocated for these purposes upon 27 mutual agreement of the parties from available appropriations. This 28 program shall expire July 1, 2026. 29 § 8. Professional development committee. Pursuant to the terms of an 30 agreement negotiated between the state and the employee organization 31 representing the collective negotiating unit designated as the state 32 university graduate student negotiating unit in the state university of 33 New York established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, 34 there shall be continued a professional development committee to review, 35 make recommendations and implement programs for professional develop- 36 ment. Such program shall be administered in accordance with such agree- 37 ment within the appropriations made available therefor. Pursuant to the 38 terms of the collective bargaining agreement, these funds may be reallo- 39 cated for use by other joint committees upon mutual agreement of the 40 parties. This program shall expire July 1, 2026. 41 § 9. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appro- 42 priations contained in this act shall be available to the state for the 43 payment of grievance and arbitration settlements and awards provided for 44 in the collective negotiating agreement between the state and employee 45 organization representing the collective negotiating unit designated as 46 the state university graduate student negotiating unit in the state 47 university of New York established pursuant to article 14 of the civil 48 service law. 49 § 10. Accidental death benefit. Pursuant to the terms of an agreement 50 negotiated between the state and the employee organization representing 51 the collective negotiating unit designated as the state university grad- 52 uate student negotiating unit in the state university of New York estab- 53 lished pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, there shall 54 continue to be a death benefit in the amount of fifty thousand dollars, 55 in the event an employee dies on or after July 2, 2007 as the result of 56 an accidental on-the-job injury and a death benefit is paid pursuant to A. 8799 5 1 the workers' compensation law, payable by the state to the employee's 2 surviving spouse and children to whom the workers' compensation acci- 3 dental death benefit is paid, or to the employee's estate, and in the 4 same proportion as the workers' compensation accidental death benefit is 5 paid. Such program shall be administered in accordance with such agree- 6 ment within the appropriations made available therefor. 7 § 11. Stipend increases and benefit modifications. The stipend 8 increases and benefit modifications provided for by this act for state 9 employees and any incumbent, as defined by section one of this act, in 10 the collective negotiating unit designated as the state university grad- 11 uate student negotiating unit in the state university of New York estab- 12 lished pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law shall not be 13 implemented until the director of the governor's office of employee 14 relations has delivered to the director of the budget and the comp- 15 troller a letter certifying that there is in effect with respect to such 16 negotiating unit a collective negotiating agreement which provides for 17 such increases and modifications and which is ratified and fully 18 executed in writing with the state pursuant to article 14 of the civil 19 service law. 20 § 12. Date of entitlement to stipend increase. Notwithstanding the 21 provisions of this act or of any other provision of law to the contrary, 22 the stipend increase of any incumbent, as defined by section one of this 23 act, of the collective negotiating unit designated as the state univer- 24 sity graduate student negotiating unit in the state university of New 25 York established pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law, as 26 provided by this act, shall be added to the stipend of such incumbent at 27 the beginning of the payroll period the first day of which is nearest to 28 the effective date of such increase as provided in this act, or at the 29 beginning of the earlier of two payroll periods the first days of which 30 are nearest but equally near to the effective date of such increase as 31 provided in this act; provided, however, that for the purposes of deter- 32 mining the stipend of such employee upon reclassification, reallocation, 33 appointment, promotion, transfer, demotion, reinstatement or other 34 change of status, such stipend increase shall be deemed to be effective 35 on the date thereof as prescribed by this act, and the payment thereof 36 pursuant to this section on a date prior thereto, instead of on such 37 effective date, shall not operate to confer any additional compensation 38 rights or benefits on such employee. Payment of such stipend increase 39 may be deferred pursuant to section thirteen of this act. 40 § 13. Deferred payment of stipend increase. Notwithstanding the 41 provisions of this act, or of any other provision of law to the contra- 42 ry, pending payment of stipends pursuant to this act for any incumbent, 43 as defined by section one of this act, of positions subject to this act, 44 such incumbent shall receive, as partial compensation for services 45 rendered, the stipends otherwise payable in their respective position. 46 An incumbent, as defined by section one of this act, holding a position 47 subject to this act at any time during the period from July 2, 2023, 48 until the time when stipend increases are first paid pursuant to this 49 act for such services in excess of the compensation actually received 50 therefor, shall be entitled to a lump sum payment for the difference 51 between the stipend to which such incumbent is entitled for such service 52 and the stipend actually received therefor. Such lump sum payment shall 53 be made as soon as practicable. 54 § 14. Use of appropriations. Notwithstanding any provision of the 55 state finance law or any other provision of law to the contrary, the 56 state comptroller is authorized to pay any amounts required by the fore- A. 8799 6 1 going provisions of this act. To the extent that existing appropriations 2 available to any state department or agency in any fund are insufficient 3 to accomplish the purposes set forth in this section, the director of 4 the budget is authorized to allocate to the various departments and 5 agencies, from any appropriations available in any fund, the amounts 6 necessary to make such payments. Any appropriations or other funds 7 available to any state department or agency for personal service or for 8 other related employee benefits during the fiscal year commencing April 9 1, 2025 shall be available for the payment of any liabilities or obli- 10 gations incurred pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this act, 11 whether occurring prior to or during the state fiscal year commencing 12 April 1, 2025. 13 § 15. Notwithstanding any provision of the state finance law or any 14 other provision of law to the contrary, the sum of $30,200,000 is hereby 15 appropriated in the general fund/state purposes account (10050) in 16 miscellaneous-all state departments and agencies solely for 17 apportionment/transfer by the director of the budget for use by any 18 state department or agency in any fund for the fiscal year beginning 19 April 1, 2025 to supplement appropriations for personal service, other 20 than personal service and fringe benefits, and to carry out the 21 provisions of this act. The monies hereby appropriated are available for 22 payment of any liabilities or obligations incurred prior to or during 23 the state fiscal year commencing April 1, 2025. For this purpose, these 24 appropriations shall remain in full force and effect for the payment of 25 liabilities incurred on or before March 31, 2026. 26 § 16. Notwithstanding any provision of the state finance law to the 27 contrary, the several amounts as hereinafter set forth, or so much ther- 28 eof as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated for the fiscal year 29 beginning April 1, 2023 to supplement appropriations available for 30 personal service, other than personal service and fringe benefits, and 31 to carry out the provisions of this act. Moreover, the amounts appropri- 32 ated as nonpersonal service may be suballocated/transferred to any state 33 department or agency as needed. The monies hereby appropriated are 34 available for payment of any liabilities or obligations incurred prior 35 to or during the state fiscal year commencing April 1, 2023. For this 36 purpose, these appropriations shall remain in full force and effect for 37 the payment of liabilities incurred on or before March 31, 2026. No 38 money shall be available for expenditure from this appropriation until a 39 certification of approval has been issued by the director of the budget 40 and such certificate or any amendment thereto has been filed with the 41 state comptroller, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, and 42 the chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee. 43 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 44 General Fund / State Operations 45 State Purposes Account - 10050 46 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 47 Doctoral Program Recruitment and Retention 48 Enhancement Fund, Comprehensive College 49 Graduate Program Recruitment and Retention 50 Fund, Fee Mitigation Fund, Downstate 51 Location Fund, Statewide Professional A. 8799 7 1 Development Committee, Pre-Tax and Work- 2 Life Services Programs ....................... 9,700,000 3 § 17. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 4 have been in full force and effect on and after July 2, 2023.